Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-1001
Cities of the First Class Police Officers Retirement Act, how cited.

Sections 16-1001 to 16-1019 shall be known and may be cited as the Cities of the First Class Police Officers Retirement Act.

Laws 1983, LB 237, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB1082, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB822, § 1.
July 18, 2026